Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Slum Clearance.

§ 43-35-101.
Definitions.

The following terms, whenever used or referred to in this article, shall have the following respective meanings for the purposes of this article, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Municipality” shall mean any city, town or village in this state.

“Governing body” shall mean the board of aldermen, council, board, or commissioners, or other legislative body, charged with governing a municipality.

“Public officer” shall mean the officer or officers in charge of any municipal department who are authorized by ordinance adopted hereunder to exercise the powers prescribed by such ordinance and by this article.

“Public authority” shall mean any housing authority, or any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality or state relating to health, fire, building regulations, or to other activities concerning buildings in the municipality.

“Owner” shall mean the holder of the title in fee, or a mortgagee or trustee, whose interest is shown of record, or who is in possession of a building, or any person in control of a building, or the agent of any such person.

“Parties in interest” shall mean individuals, associations, or corporations who have an interest of record in or who are in possession of a building.

“Building” means any building or structure or part thereof used and occupied by humans as a dwelling, store, factory, warehouse, requiring the presence of humans therein, or intended to be so used, and includes any yard, garden, parking or storage area, outhouses, and appurtenances belonging thereto or usually enjoyed therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3508; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 8; Laws, 1958, ch. 525, § 6.

§ 43-35-103.
Slum clearance authorized.

It is hereby found and declared that the existence and occupation of dwellings and other buildings in the municipalities of this state, which are unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy, are inimical to the welfare and dangerous and injurious to the health, safety and morals of the people of this state; and that a public necessity exists for the repair or elimination of such buildings.

Whenever any municipality of this state finds that there exist in such municipality buildings, which are unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy, due to dilapidation, defects increasing the hazards of fires, accidents or other calamities, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or due to other conditions rendering such buildings unsafe and unsanitary, and dangerous or detrimental to the health, safety or morals, or which are otherwise inimical to the welfare of the residents of such municipality, power is hereby conferred upon such municipality to exercise its police powers to remedy or eliminate the aforesaid conditions in the manner provided in this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3501; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 525, § 1.

§ 43-35-105.
Ordinances; administrative officer; condemnation proceedings.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance finding that building conditions of the character described in Section 43-35-103 exist within a municipality, the governing body of such municipality is hereby authorized to adopt ordinances relating to the buildings within such municipality which are unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy. Such ordinances shall include the following provisions:

That a public officer be designated or appointed to exercise the powers prescribed by the ordinances.

That whenever a petition is filed with the public officer by a public authority or by at least five (5) residents of the municipality, charging that any building is unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy, or whenever it appears to the public officer, on his own motion, that any building is unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy, the public officer shall, if his preliminary investigation discloses a basis for such charges, issue and cause to be served upon the owner of and parties in interest in such premises a complaint, stating the charges in that respect and containing a notice that a hearing will be held before the public officer, or his designated agent, at a place therein fixed not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days after the serving of said complaint; and that the owner and parties in interest shall be given the right to file an answer to the complaint and to appear in person, or otherwise, and give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint.

That if, after such notice and hearing, the public officer determines that the building under consideration is unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy, he shall state in writing his findings of fact in support of such determination and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner thereof an order requiring him, to the extent and within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter or improve the said building to render it fit for human habitation, use or occupancy or, at the option of the owner, to vacate and close the building as a human habitation, or for human use or occupancy.

That, if the owner fails to comply with such order within the time prescribed, the public officer may cause the building to be vacated and closed; that the public officer may cause to be posted on the main entrance of any building so closed a placard with the following words:

“This building is unfit for human habitation, use or occupancy; the use or occupation of this building by humans is prohibited and unlawful.”

Any person who shall rent, lease or occupy, or who shall permit any person to rent, lease or occupy such building for a human habitation, use or occupancy, shall be liable for such fine as may be prescribed by the ordinances of the municipality.

That if, after notice and hearing, the public officer determines that a building is in such condition, because of dilapidation, disrepair, structural defects, or otherwise, that it is dangerous or injurious to the health or safety of the public or the occupants of buildings or the occupants of neighboring buildings, said public officer shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner an order requiring him to repair, alter or improve the said building to the extent and within the time specified in such order, or, at the option of the owner, to remove or demolish such building; that if the owner fails to comply with such order within the time prescribed, the public officer may cause such building to be repaired, altered or improved in accordance with the order. If such repairs, alterations or improvements cannot be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the value of the building, said public officer may cause such building to be removed or demolished; the ordinance of the municipality may fix a certain percentage of such cost in relation to the value of a building as being reasonable for such purpose; and the cost of such repairs, alterations, improvements or removal, or demolition, in addition to a penalty not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the actual costs which may be imposed by the municipality, shall be a lien against such real estate, and assessed and collected as a special tax. The governing authorities of any municipality ordering such assessment shall fix a day for the hearing of objections to such assessment and shall cause the municipal clerk to give to the property owner ten (10) days’ written notice, by mail, if the post-office address of the owner be known, but if the post-office address of the owner be unknown, notice shall be given by posting notice for at least ten (10) days in five (5) public places in the municipality, of the time and place for the hearing of objections to such assessment; one of such public places for posting notice as aforesaid shall be on the land which is the subject matter of such assessment. If the amount of said special tax is not paid in full within six (6) months from and after the date the assessment becomes final, the tax collector shall proceed to advertise and sell the said real estate, or a sufficient amount thereof to recover said special tax and all costs of the sale, after having given notice of the time and place of such sale as is required by law for the sale of land for delinquent ad valorem taxes. From the proceeds of said sale, the tax collector shall first pay the cost of the sale, after which he shall pay the cost of such repairs, alterations, improvement, removal or demolition and any penalty imposed by the municipality; and any amount remaining over shall be deposited by him with the clerk of the circuit court as hereinafter provided. If the building is removed or demolished by the public officer, he may sell the materials of such building and shall credit the proceeds of such sale against the cost of the removal or demolition; and any balance remaining shall be deposited in the circuit court by the public officer, shall be secured in such manner as may be directed by such court, and shall be disbursed by such court to the persons found to be entitled thereto by the final award or judgment of such court. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement by summary proceedings or otherwise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3502; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 525, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 529, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990).

§ 43-35-107.
Unsafe buildings.

An ordinance adopted by a municipality under this article shall provide that the public officer may determine that a building is unfit for human habitation, use or occupation, if he finds that conditions exist in such buildings which are dangerous or injurious to the health, safety or morals of the persons using such buildings for human habitation, use or occupation, or to the public. Such conditions may include the following, without limiting the generality of the foregoing: defects therein increasing the hazards of fire, accident, or other calamities; lack of adequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities; dilapidation; disrepair; structural defects; and uncleanliness. Such ordinance may provide additional standards to guide the public officer, or his agents, in determining the fitness of a building for human habitation, use or occupation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3503; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 525, § 3.

§ 43-35-109.
Service of complaints.

Complaints or orders issued by a public officer pursuant to an ordinance adopted under this article shall be served upon persons either personally or by registered mail; but if the whereabouts of such persons is unknown, and the same cannot be ascertained by the public officer in the exercise of reasonable diligence, and the public officer shall make an affidavit to that effect, then the serving of such complaint or order upon such persons may be made by publishing the same once each week for two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper printed and published in the municipality, or, in the absence of such a newspaper, in one printed and published in the county and circulating in the municipality in which the dwellings are located. A copy of such complaint or order shall be posted in a conspicuous place on premises affected by the complaint or order. A copy of such complaint or order shall also be filed in the proper office or offices for the filing of lis pendens notices in the county in which the dwelling is located, and such filing of the complaint shall have the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law. The rules and evidence prevailing in courts of law or equity shall not be controlling in hearings before the public officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3504; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 4.

§ 43-35-111.
Restraining order; hearing.

Any person affected by an order issued by the public officer may apply to the circuit court for an injunction restraining the public officer from carrying out the provisions of the order, and the court, or any judge thereof, may, upon such application, issue an order restraining the public officer pending final disposition of the cause. Hearings shall be had by the court on such applications within twenty (20) days, or as soon thereafter as possible, and shall be given preference over other matters on the court’s calendar. The court shall hear and determine the issues raised, and shall enter such final order or decree as law and justice may require. In all such proceedings, the findings of the public officer as to facts, if supported by evidence, shall be conclusive. Costs shall be in the discretion of the court. The remedies herein provided shall be exclusive remedies, and no person affected by an order of the public officer shall be entitled to recover any damages for action taken by the public officer under such order or because of non-compliance therewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3505; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 5.

§ 43-35-113.
Powers of administrative officer.

An ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality may authorize the public officer to exercise such powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this article, including the following powers, in addition to others herein granted:

To investigate the building conditions in the municipality in order to determine which buildings therein are unfit for human habitation, use or occupation;

To administer oaths, affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence;

To enter upon premises for the purpose of making examinations, provided that such entries shall be made in such manner as to cause the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession;

To appoint and fix the duties of such officers, agents and employees, as he deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the ordinance; and,

To delegate any of his functions and powers under the ordinance to such officers and agents as he may designate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3506; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 6; Laws, 1958, ch. 525, § 4.

§ 43-35-115.
Estimate of costs.

The governing body of any municipality adopting an ordinance under this article shall, as soon as possible thereafter, prepare an estimate of the annual expenses or costs to provide the equipment, personnel and supplies necessary for periodic examinations and investigations of the buildings in such municipality for the purpose of determining the fitness of such buildings for human habitation, use or occupancy, and for the enforcement and administration of its ordinances adopted under this article; and any such municipality is authorized to make such appropriations from its revenues as it may deem necessary for this purpose, and may accept and apply grants or donations to assist it in carrying out the provisions of such ordinances.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3507; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 7; Laws, 1958, ch. 525, § 5.

§ 43-35-117.
Construction of law.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any city to enforce any provisions of its charter or its ordinances or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and the powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3509; Laws, 1938, ch. 337, § 9.